New York, session 2025-2026, A172.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of the department of labor, in consulta- 2 tion with the commissioner of the office for people with developmental 3 disabilities, hereinafter the "commissioners," and any other department, 4 division, board, bureau, commission, agency or public authority of the 5 state or any political subdivision thereof deemed necessary by the 6 commissioners shall prepare a comprehensive study and report on the 7 wages earned by individuals who help, support, assist, and/or work with 8 the developmentally disabled, hereinafter referred to as "aides". Such 9 study shall include, but not be limited to the following information 10 about each aide: hourly wage earned, approximate yearly salary earned, 11 highest level of education completed, certifications held, experience, 12 and geographic location. 13 § 2. The commissioners shall publish such report to the governor, the 14 temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the 15 minority leader of the senate, the minority leader of the assembly, and 16 the chairs of the senate and assembly mental health and labor committees 17 no later than December 31, 2025. 18 § 3. Upon receiving the report and recommendation, the governor and 19 legislature shall determine and publish an appropriate base wage for 20 aides to the developmentally disabled no later than March 31, 2026. 21 This base wage shall be funded through reimbursements from Medicaid and 22 any other funds as determined by the director of the division of the 23 budget. 24 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01152-01-5